District of Columbia statutes.
10-147

Potomac Park — Establishment.

The entire reclaimed area formerly known as the Potomac Flats, together with the tidal reservoirs, are made and declared a public park, under the name of the Potomac Park, and to be forever held and used as a park for the recreation and pleasure of the people.

Mar. 3, 1897, 29 Stat. 624, ch. 375
This section is referenced in § 10-150.
1981 Ed., § 8-147.
1973 Ed., § 8-153.